parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/SPANISH/FST2/src/lex-cities.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8
!# CONTENT:     country names
!#
!# LANGUAGE:    SPANISH
!#
!# CREATED:	04-Aug-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================


Multichar_Symbols

+Prop 
+City
+Capital

+Sg +Pl +SP
+Masc +Fem +MF

+Acron +Abrev


!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# Continuation classes

LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;

LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;

!# plural = singular
LEXICON MSP	+Masc+SP	#;
LEXICON FSP	+Fem+SP		#;
LEXICON MFSP	MSP; FSP;

!# masc = fem
LEXICON XSG	+MF+Sg		#;
LEXICON XPL	+MF+Pl		#;
LEXICON XSGPL	XSG; XPL;

!# masc = fem; plural = singular
LEXICON XSP	+MF+SP		#;

!# =============================================================================
!# MAIN LEXICON
!# =============================================================================

LEXICON ROOT
Abuja+Prop+City+Capital			MSG;	!@
Acapulco+Prop+City			MSG;
Acatlán+Prop+City				MSG;
Addis% Abeba+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Ahuachapán+Prop+City		MSG;
Alabama+Prop+City			FSG;
Alameda+Prop+City			FSG;
Albacete+Prop+City			MSG;	!@
Albarracín+Prop+City		MSG;
Alburquerque+Prop+City		MSG;
Alcalá% de% Henares+Prop+City	MSG;
Alcantarilla+Prop+City		FSG;
Alcázar% de% San% Juan+Prop+City	MSG;
Alcorcón+Prop+City		MSG;
Alejandría+Prop+City	FSG;
Algar+Prop+City		MSG;
Alhama% de% Almería+Prop+City	FSG;
Alhama% de% Granada+Prop+City	FSG;
Alicante+Prop+City			MSG;	!@
Almaguer+Prop+City	MSG;
Almansa+Prop+City		FSG;
Almendralejo+Prop+City	MSG;
Almuñécar+Prop+City	FSG;
Altea+Prop+City		FSG;
Amán+Prop+City+Capital			MSG;	!@
Amman+Prop+City+Capital			MSG;	!@
Amsterdam+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Andorra% la% Vella+Prop+City+Capital	FSG;
Antalya+Prop+City			FSG;
Antananarivo+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Antigua% Guatemala+Prop+City	FSG;
Antioquia+Prop+City		FSG;
Apia+Prop+City+Capital			FSG;	!@
Aranda% de% Duero+Prop+City	FSG;
Aranjuez+Prop+City		MSG;
Ashgabat+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Asmara+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;	!@
Astana+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;	!@
Atenas+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Atlanta+Prop+City				FSG;
Aviñón+Prop+City		MSG;
Badajoz+Prop+City			MSG;	!@
Badalona+Prop+City	FSG;
Baghdad+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Baky+Prop+City+Capital			MSG;	!@
Bandar% Seri% Begawan+Prop+City+Capital	MSG;	!@
Bangui+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Baracaldo+Prop+City		MSG;
Barcelona+Prop+City			FSG;	!@
Barcelos+Prop+City		MSG;
Basilea+Prop+City			FSG;
Bazán+Prop+City			FSG;
Beijing+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Belén+Prop+City			MSG;
Belmopan+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Benasque+Prop+City		MSG;
Benavides% de% Órbigo+Prop+City	MSG;
Berlin+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Berna+Prop+City+Capital			FSG;	!@
Betanzos+Prop+City		MSG;
Betulia+Prop+City			FSG;
Biescas+Prop+City			FSG;
Bilbao+Prop+City			MSG;	!@
Birmingham+Prop+City		MSG;
Bissau+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Bogotá+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Brasilia+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;
Bratislava+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;	!@
Brazzaville+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Brea% de% Aragón+Prop+City		MSG;
Brighton+Prop+City		MSG;
Brujas+Prop+City			FSG;
Bruxelles+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;
Bucarest+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Budapest+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Buitrago+Prop+City		MSG;
Burdeos+Prop+City			MSG;
Burgos+Prop+City			MSG;	!@
Cabanas+Prop+City			FSG;
Cabanes+Prop+City			MSG;
Cabañas+Prop+City			FSG;
Calahorra+Prop+City		FSG;
Calatayud+Prop+City		MSG;
Calcuta+Prop+City+Capital	FSG;
Cambridge+Prop+City		MSG;
Canberra+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;	!@
Cancún+Prop+City	XSP;
Cannes+Prop+City	XSP;
Cartagena+Prop+City			FSG;
Castellón% de% la% Plana+Prop+City		MSG;	!@
Castries+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Ceuta+Prop+City				FSG;	!@
Chicago+Prop+City			MSG;
Chihuahua+Prop+City		FSG;
Cifuentes+Prop+City		MSG;
Ciudad% del% Cabo+Prop+City+Capital	FSG;	!@
Ciudad% Rodrigo+Prop+City	FSG;
Cochabamba+Prop+City		FSG;
Columbia+Prop+City		FSG;
Comonfort+Prop+City		MSG;
Compostela+Prop+City		FSG;
Copacabana+Prop+City		FSG;
Córdoba+Prop+City			FSG;	!@
Cotonou+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Cuenca+Prop+City			FSG;	!@
Dakota+Prop+City			FSG;
Damasco+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Dhaka+Prop+City+Capital			MSG;	!@
Donosti+Prop+City			MSG;	!@
Dublin+Prop+City			MSG;
Dueñas+Prop+City			FSG;
Dushanbe+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Ejido+Prop+City			MSG;
El% Barco% de% Ávila+Prop+City	MSG;
El% Callao+Prop+City		MSG;
El% Salvador+Prop+City		MSG;
Estepona+Prop+City		FSG;
Figueras+Prop+City		FSG;
Flandes+Prop+City			MSG;
Florencia+Prop+City		FSG;
Formosa+Prop+City			FSG;
Freetown+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Gandía+Prop+City			FSG;
Génova+Prop+City			FSG;
Georgetown+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Gibraltar+Prop+City		FSG;
Girona+Prop+City			FSG;	!@
Guadalajara+Prop+City			FSG;	!@
Guadalupe+Prop+City		MSG;
Halle+Prop+City			FSG;
Hanoi+Prop+City+Capital			MSG;	!@
Heidelberg+Prop+City		MSG;
Houston+Prop+City			MSG;
Huelva+Prop+City			FSG;	!@
Huéscar+Prop+City			FSG;
Iruña+Prop+City				FSG;	!@
Jartum+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Játiva+Prop+City			FSG;
Johanesburgo+Prop+City		MSG;
Kampala+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;	!@
Katmandú+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Kiev+Prop+City+Capital			FSG;
Kingstown+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Kuala% Lumpur+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;	!@
La% Coruña+Prop+City			FSG;	!@
La% Haya+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;	!@
La% Merced+Prop+City			FSG;
La% Paz+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;	!@
Las% Palmas% de% Gran% Canaria+Prop+City	FSG;	!@
Las% Vegas+Prop+City			FSG;
Lebrija+Prop+City				FSG;
Le% Mans+Prop+City			MSG;
Líbano+Prop+City	XSP;
Lilongwe+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Lisboa+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;
Ljubljana+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;	!@
Logroño+Prop+City			MSG;	!@
Londres+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;
Luanda+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;	!@
Lugo+Prop+City				MSG;	!@
Lusaka+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;	!@
Lyon+Prop+City				XSG;	
Malabo+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Malacatan+Prop+City			FSG;
Mallorca+Prop+City			FSG;	!@
Manama+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;	!@
Manila+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;	!@
Manises+Prop+City				MSG;
Marburg+Prop+City				MSG;
Marsella+Prop+City			FSG;
Medinaceli+Prop+City			MSG;
Melilla+Prop+City			FSG;	!@
Mérida+Prop+City				FSG;
Minsk+Prop+City+Capital			MSG;
Mogadiscio+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Monrovia+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Montpellier+Prop+City			MSG;
Moscow+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;
Munich+Prop+City				MSG;
Murcia+Prop+City			FSG;	!@
Nariño+Prop+City				MSG;
N’Djamena+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Nicosia+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;
Nueva% York+Prop+City			FSG;
Nuku’alofa+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Ocaña+Prop+City				FSG;
Olmedo+Prop+City				MSG;
Orleans+Prop+City				MSG;
Oslo+Prop+City+Capital			FSG;
Otumba+Prop+City				FSG;
Oviedo+Prop+City			MSG;	!@
Padua+Prop+City			FSG;
Palestina+Prop+City		FSG;
Palma% de% Mallorca+Prop+City		MSG;	!@
Pamplona+Prop+City			FSG;	!@
Parma+Prop+City				FSG;
Peiking+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;
Pensilvania+Prop+City			FSG;
Philadelphia+Prop+City			FSG;
Pinto+Prop+City				MSG;
Plasencia+Prop+City			FSG;
Pontevedra+Prop+City			FSG;	!@
Port% Moresby+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Poznan+Prop+City			MSG;
Prague+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;
Puerto% Rico+Prop+City			MSG;
Quiroga+Prop+City				FSG;
Rangún+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Ravena+Prop+City				FSG;
Reykjavik+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;
Riga+Prop+City+Capital			FSG;	!@
Rimini+Prop+City				MSG;
Rome+Prop+City				FSG;
Roseau+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Rueda+Prop+City				FSG;
Saboyá+Prop+City				MSG;
Salamanca+Prop+City			FSG;	!@
Sanaá+Prop+City+Capital			MSG;	!@
San% Juan+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
San% Luis+Prop+City			MSG;
San% Rafael+Prop+City			MSG;
San% Sebastián+Prop+City		FSG;	!@
Santa% Cruz% de% Tenerife+Prop+City	FSG;	!@
Santa% Elena+Prop+City			FSG;
Santa% Fe% de% Bogotá+Prop+City+Capital	FSG;	!@
Santiago% de% Compostela+Prop+City	MSG;
Santurce+Prop+City			MSG;
Seattle+Prop+City				MSG;
Sepúlveda+Prop+City		FSG;
Sidney+Prop+City			MSP;
Sigüenza+Prop+City		FSG;
Singapore+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Sofía+Prop+City+Capital			FSG;
Sri% Jayawardenepura% Kotte+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Stuttgart+Prop+City			MSG;
Suesca+Prop+City			FSG;
Taipei+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Tánger+Prop+City			MSG;
Tarragona+Prop+City			FSG;	!@
Tárrega+Prop+City			FSG;
Teherán+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Tenerife+Prop+City			FSG;	!@
Thimphu+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Tokio+Prop+City+Capital			MSG;	!@
Toledo+Prop+City			FSG;	!@
Tordesillas+Prop+City		FSG;
Torremocha+Prop+City		FSG;
Torrevieja+Prop+City		MSG;
Trujillo+Prop+City		MSG;
Tudela+Prop+City			FSG;
Ubrique+Prop+City			MSG;
Ureña+Prop+City			FSG;
Utrecht+Prop+City			MSG;
Valdivia+Prop+City		FSG;
Valletta+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Varsovia+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;
Vera+Prop+City			FSG;
Viena+Prop+City+Capital			FSG;
Vientiane+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;	!@
Vigo+Prop+City			MSG;
Vilna+Prop+City+Capital			FSG;
Vitoria+Prop+City			FSG;	!@
Washington% Dc+Prop+City+Capital	MSG;
Windhoek+Prop+City+Capital		MSG;	!@
Yapeyú+Prop+City			MSG;
Zagreb+Prop+City+Capital		FSG;
Zaragoza+Prop+City			FSG;	!@
Zurich+Prop+City			MSG;
